Colorado, session 2026A, HB1372.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-70-118, amend (1)
introductory portion, (2) introductory portion, (2)(a), (3), (4) introductory
portion, and (5) as follows:
23-70-118. Requirements for money that is appropriated to the
department of higher education for use by the Auraria higher
education center - repeal.
(1) Any money that the general assembly appropriates to the
department of higher education for the Auraria higher education center to
use for operational costs in FOR the 2025-26 state fiscal year AND FOR EACH
STATE FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER must be used as agreed upon by the
constituent institutions in baseline service level agreements, including
operational costs associated with:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(2) Any baseline service level agreement that the Auraria higher
education center enters into using money appropriated by the general
assembly for the 2025-26 state fiscal year AND FOR EACH STATE FISCAL
YEAR THEREAFTER must:
(a) Be executed by the contracting parties no later than September
1, 2025 SEPTEMBER 1 OF EACH FISCAL YEAR, until which time the Auraria
higher education center and the constituent institutions shall operate
according to existing service level agreements;
(3) In the 2025-26 state fiscal year, AND EACH STATE FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, the Auraria higher education center shall manage all resources
related to baseline service level agreements and goals and shall present
quarterly updates regarding baseline service level agreements and goals to
the constituent institutions.
(4) The Auraria higher education center shall establish fee structures
for the 2025-26 state fiscal year for all services that are not already provided
for in the baseline service level agreements. The constituent institutions
may enter into additional agreements with the Auraria higher education
center for services that are not provided for in the baseline service level
agreements, in which case the Auraria higher education center shall explain
why the additional contracted services do not fall within the baseline service
level agreements. The fee structures established pursuant to this subsection
(4) must:
(5) This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2026 JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1372

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1372